Washington statutes.
RCW 35.78.040

Design standards must be followed by municipalities—Approval of deviations.

The governing body of the several municipalities shall apply the uniform design standards adopted under RCW 35.78.030 to all new construction on major arterial and secondary arterial streets and to reconstruction of old such streets as far as practicable. No deviation from the design standards as to such streets may be made without approval of the state aid engineer.

[ 1984 c 7 s 25; 1965 c 7 s 35.78.040. Prior: 1949 c 164 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9300-4.]